Utah statutes.
63G-7-803.   Liability insurance -- Construction of policy not in compliance with act.

(1)  If any insurance policy, rider, or endorsement issued after June 30, 2004 that was purchased to insure against any risk that may arise as a result of the application of this chapter contains any condition or provision not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, that policy, rider, or endorsement is not invalid, but shall be construed and applied according to the conditions and provisions that would have applied had the policy, rider, or endorsement been in full compliance with this chapter, provided that the policy is otherwise valid.

(2)  If any insurance policy, rider, or endorsement issued after June 30, 1966 and before July 1, 2004 that was purchased to insure against any risk that may arise as a result of the application of this chapter contains any condition or provision not in compliance with the requirements of the chapter, that policy, rider, or endorsement is not invalid, but shall be construed and applied according to the conditions and provisions that would have applied had the policy, rider, or endorsement been in full compliance with this chapter, provided that the policy is otherwise valid.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

